District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

46-717

Duties of Court as to receipt and disbursement of payments.

Repealed.

History

July 10, 1957, 71 Stat. 288, Pub. L. 85-94, § 17
Feb. 9, 1996, D.C. Law 11-81, § 902, 42 DCR 6748

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 30-317.
1973 Ed., § 30-317.